Maryland, session 2025, SB0599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–208.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Mobile crisis team” has the meaning stated in § 10–1401 of this article.
(3) “Program” means the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Grant
Program.
(b) (1) There is a Behavioral Health Crisis Response Grant Program in the
Department.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide funds to local jurisdictions to
establish and expand community behavioral health crisis response systems.
(e) The Governor shall include in the annual operating budget bill the following
amounts for the Program:
– 1 –

Ch. 666 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2020;
(2) $4,000,000 for fiscal year 2021;
(3) $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2022;
(4) $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2023;
(5) $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2024; [and]
(6) $5,000,000 for fiscal year 2025; AND
(7) $5,000,000 FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029.
(f) Beginning in fiscal year 2023, at least one–third of the appropriation required
under subsection (e) of this section shall be used to award competitive grants for mobile
crisis teams.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –